Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2359.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1609.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1609.03. Adult incarceration private contractors; liability for services; public records A private contractor that contracts with any governmental entity to provide detention or incarceration services for offenders:  shall be 1. Is liable for the cost of any emergency, public safety or security services provided to the contractor by the this state or any political subdivision of the this state and shall reimburse the this state or any political subdivision of the this state for the cost of any such services. 2. Shall keep and maintain a complete and accurate record of all of its services.  The private contractor is a public body for the purposes of and is subject to title 39, chapter 1. END_STATUTE